Washington statutes.
RCW 16.36.010

Quarantine—Hold order.

(1) The director shall supervise the prevention of the spread and the suppression of infectious, contagious, communicable, and dangerous diseases affecting animals within, in transit through, and imported into the state.

(2) The director may issue a quarantine order and enforce the quarantine of any animal or its reproductive products when any animal or its reproductive products are affected with or have been exposed to disease or when there is reasonable cause to investigate whether any animal or its reproductive products are affected with or have been exposed to disease, either within or outside the state. Overt disease or exposure to disease in any animal or its reproductive products need not be immediately obvious for a quarantine order to be issued or enforced. The quarantine shall remain in effect as long as the director deems necessary.

(3) The director may issue a hold order when:

(a) Overt disease or exposure to disease in an animal is not immediately obvious but there is reasonable cause to investigate whether an animal is diseased or has been exposed to disease;

(b) Import health papers, permits, or other transportation documents required by law or rule are not complete or are suspected to be fraudulent; or

(c) Further transport of an animal would jeopardize the well-being of the animal or other animals in Washington state.

A hold order is in effect for fourteen days and expires when released by the director or no later than midnight on the fourteenth day from the date of the hold order. A hold order may be replaced with a quarantine order for the purpose of animal disease control.

(4) Any animal or animal reproductive product placed under a quarantine or hold order shall be kept separate and apart from other animals designated in the instructions of the quarantine or hold order, and shall not be allowed to have anything in common with other animals.

(5) The expenses of handling and caring for any animal or animal reproductive product placed under a quarantine or hold order are the responsibility of the owner.

(6) The director has authority over the quarantine or hold area until the quarantine or hold order is released or the hold order expires.

(7) Any animal or animal reproductive product placed under a quarantine or hold order may not be moved, transported, or sold without written approval from the director or until the quarantine or hold order is released, or the hold order expires.

(8) The director may administer oaths and examine witnesses and records in the performance of his or her duties to control diseases affecting animals.

[ 2007 c 71 s 5; 2004 c 251 s 1; 1998 c 8 s 2; 1927 c 165 s 2; RRS s 3111. Prior: 1915 c 100 s 6, part; 1903 c 26 s 2, part.]